Washington statutes.
RCW 10.27.020

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter:

(1) The term "court" shall mean any superior court in the state of Washington.

(2) The term "public attorney" shall mean the prosecuting attorney of the county in which a grand jury or special grand jury is impaneled; the attorney general of the state of Washington when acting pursuant to RCW 10.27.070(9) and, the special prosecutor appointed by the governor, pursuant to RCW 10.27.070(10), and their deputies or special deputies.

(3) The term "indictment" shall mean a written accusation found by a grand jury.

(4) The term "principal" shall mean any person whose conduct is being investigated by a grand jury or special inquiry judge.

(5) The term "witness" shall mean any person summoned to appear before a grand jury or special inquiry judge to answer questions or produce evidence.

(6) A "grand jury" consists of twelve persons, is impaneled by a superior court and constitutes a part of such court. The functions of a grand jury are to hear, examine and investigate evidence concerning criminal activity and corruption and to take action with respect to such evidence. The grand jury shall operate as a whole and not by committee.

(7) A "special inquiry judge" is a superior court judge designated by a majority of the superior court judges of a county to hear and receive evidence of crime and corruption.

[ 1988 c 188 s 16; 1971 ex.s. c 67 s 2.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1988 c 188: See notes following RCW 2.36.010.